Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.220

Election assistants, deputies—Appointment, qualifications.

The county auditor of each county, as ex officio supervisor of all primaries and elections, general or special, within the county under Title 29A RCW, may appoint one or more well-qualified persons to act as assistants or deputies; however, not less than two persons of the auditor's office who conduct primaries and elections in the county shall be certified under chapter 29A.04 RCW as elections administrators.

[ 2015 c 53 s 62; 1992 c 163 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 163 ss 5-13: See note following RCW 29A.04.530.